New York, session 2025-2026, A4112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.22 to read as follows: 3 § 13.22 Free use of state parks. Notwithstanding the provisions of 4 any other law, any person who is a resident of New York state, upon 5 proof of such residence and upon proof that such person served as a 6 certified first responder, as defined in section three thousand one of 7 the public health law, who participated in the rescue effort conducted 8 in response to the World Trade Center attack on September eleventh, two 9 thousand one, shall be permitted to use any of the state parks in this 10 state, including on weekends and public holidays, upon the same terms 11 and conditions as apply to the general public, but without the payment 12 of any fees or other charges for the use of such state parks. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 14 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 15 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 16 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 17 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03346-01-5